Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 1, 2 and 3, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2025 (Ballot Measure 119 (2024)),
are repealed.
Passed by House February 17, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4162 (HB 4162-INTRO) Page 1